Utah statutes.
73-18a-5.   Chemical treatment of marine toilet contents -- Rules established by board and Department of Environmental Quality.

The board shall establish by rule, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, with approval by the Department of Environmental Quality, as provided in this chapter, standards relating to chemical treatment of marine toilet contents.

